District of Columbia statutes.
44-1051.04

Application for initial license.

A nurse staffing agency shall submit to the Department, as part of the agency’s initial application for licensure:

(1)

The business name of the agency;

(2)

The addresses of the agency’s registered business office, operations headquarters, and District of Columbia operations headquarters;

(3)

The telephone numbers of all offices listed in paragraph (2) of this subsection;

(4)

If the agency is a corporate entity, the entity’s Certificate of Good Standing as a corporation;

(5)

The name of the agency’s responsible party;

(6)

Any other information necessary to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter, as established by regulation; and

(7)

The initial licensure fee as established by regulation.

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-74, § 4, 50 DCR 10914
This section is referenced in § 44-1051.10.